sv: Ethernet LAN-gränssnittstyp: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet över HDMI; Ethernet över USB; Ethernet över Wi-Fi; Ethernet över mobilnätet; Ethernet över koaxial; Ethernet över fiber; Ethernet över elnätet; Snabb; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Övrigt
zh-TW: 乙太網路局部區域網絡介面類型: 10 GB; 乙太網路; HDMI 乙太網路; USB 乙太網路; Wi-Fi 乙太網路; 蜂窩乙太網路; 同軸乙太網路; 光纖乙太網路; 電線乙太網路; 快速; GB; mGig; 其他
nb: Ethernet LAN-grensesnitttype: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet over HDMI; Ethernet over USB; Ethernet over Wi-Fi; Ethernet over mobilnettet; Ethernet over coax; Ethernet over fiber; Ethernet over strømlinje; Rask; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Annet
pl: Typ interfejsu Ethernet Lan: 10 gigabitów; Ethernet; Ethernet przez HDMI; Ethernet przez USB; Ethernet przez Wi-Fi; Ethernet przez sieć komórkową; Ethernet przez kabel współosiowy; Ethernet przez światłowód; Ethernet przez linię energetyczną; Szybki; Gigabit; Wielogigabitowy; Inne
cs: Typ rozhraní ethernetu (LAN): 10 gigabitů; Ethernet; Ethernet přes HDMI; Ethernet přes USB; Ethernet přes USB; Ethernet přes mobilní telefon; Ethernet přes koaxiální kabel; Ethernet přes vlákno; Ethernet přes elektrické vedení; Rychlé; Gigabitové; Multigigabitové; Jiné
de: Ethernet-LAN-Schnittstellentyp: 10 Gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet über HDMI; Ethernet über USB; Ethernet über WLAN; Ethernet über Mobilfunk; Ethernet über Koax; Ethernet über Glasfaser; Ethernet über Powerline; Schnell; Gigabit; Multi-Gigabit; Sonstiges
ru: Тип интерфейса Ethernet для локальных сетей: 10 гигабит; Ethernet; Ethernet через HDMI; Ethernet через USB; Ethernet через Wi-Fi; Ethernet через сотовую связь; Ethernet через коаксиальный кабель; Ethernet через оптоволокно; Ethernet через линию электропередач; Быстрый; Гигабитный; Мультигигабитный; Другой
lt-LT: Eterneto LAN sąsajos tipas: 10 gigabitų; Eternetas; Eternetas HDMI linija; Eternetas per USB; Eternetas belaidžiu ryšiu; Eternetas koriniu ryšiu; Eternetas bendraašiu kabeliu; Eternetas optinio pluošto linija; Ethernet maitinimo linija; Greita; Gigabitas; Kelių gigabitų; Kita
ro-RO: Tipul de interfață Ethernet LAN: 10 gigabiți; Ethernet; Ethernet prin HDMI; Ethernet prin USB; Ethernet prin Wi-Fi; Ethernet prin celular; Ethernet prin cablu coaxial; Ethernet prin fibră; Ethernet prin rețeaua de curent electric; Rapid; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Altele
tr: Ethernet Lan Arayüzü Türü: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; HDMI üzerinden Ethernet; USB üzerinden Ethernet; Wi-Fi üzerinden Ethernet; Hücresel üzerinden Ethernet; Koaksiyel üzerinden Ethernet; Fiber üzerinden Ethernet; Elektrik hattı üzerinden Ethernet; Hızlı; Gigabit; Çoklu gigabit; Diğer
en: Ethernet LAN interface type: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet over HDMI; Ethernet over USB; Ethernet over Wi-Fi; Ethernet over cellular; Ethernet over coax; Ethernet over fiber; Ethernet over powerline; Fast; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Other
ko: 이더넷 LAN 인터페이스 유형: 10기가비트; 이더넷; HDMI를 통한 이더넷; USB를 통한 이더넷; Wi-Fi를 통한 이더넷; 셀룰러를 통한 이더넷; 동축을 통한 이더넷; 광섬유를 통한 이더넷; 전력선을 통한 이더넷; 빠름; 기가비트; 멀티기가비트; 기타
fr: Type d’interface réseau Ethernet: 10 gigabits; Ethernet; Ethernet over HDMI; Ethernet over USB; Ethernet over Wi-Fi; Ethernet over cellular; Ethernet over coax; Ethernet over fiber; Ethernet over powerline; Rapide; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Autre
es: Tipo de interfaz LAN Ethernet: 10 gigabits; Ethernet; Ethernet sobre HDMI; Ethernet sobre USB; Ethernet sobre Wi-Fi; Ethernet sobre celular; Ethernet sobre coaxial; Ethernet sobre fibra; Ethernet sobre línea eléctrica; Rápido; Gigabit; Multigigabit; Otros
th: ประเภทอินเทอร์เฟซอีเทอร์เน็ตแลน: 10 กิกะบิต; อีเทอร์เน็ต; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่าน HDMI; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่าน USB; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่าน Wi-Fi; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่านเครือข่ายมือถือ; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่านสายโคแอ็กซ์เชียล; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่านสายไฟเบอร์; อีเทอร์เน็ตผ่าน Powerline; เร็ว; กิกะบิต; มัลติกิกะบิต; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος διασύνδεσης LAN Ethernet: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet over HDMI; Ethernet over USB; Ethernet over Wi-Fi; Ethernet over cellular; Ethernet over coax; Ethernet over fiber; Ethernet over powerline; Γρήγορη; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Άλλο
hu: Ethernet LAN interfész típusa: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet HDMI-n keresztül; Ethernet USB-n keresztül; Ethernet Wi-Fi-n keresztül; Ethernet mobilon keresztül; Ethernet koaxiális kábelen keresztül; Ethernet optikai kábelen keresztül; Ethernet vezetéken keresztül; Gyors; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Egyéb
zh-CN: 以太网 LAN 接口类型: 10 千兆比特; 以太网; 通过 HDMI 连接的以太网; 通过 USB 连接的以太网; 通过 Wi-Fi 连接的以太网; 通过移动电话连接的以太网; 通过同轴电缆连接的以太网; 通过光纤连接的以太网; 通过电力线连接的以太网; 快; 千兆比特; 多千兆比特; 其他
vi: Loại giao diện LAN Ethernet: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet qua HDMI; Ethernet qua USB; Ethernet qua Wi-Fi; Ethernet qua mạng di động; Ethernet qua cáp đồng trục; Ethernet qua cáp quang; Ethernet qua đường dây điện; Nhanh; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Khác
it: Tipo di interfaccia Ethernet LAN: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Da Ethernet a HDMI; Da Ethernet a USB; Da Ethernet a Wi-Fi; Da Ethernet a cellulare; Da Ethernet a cavo coassiale; Da Ethernet a fibra; Da Ethernet a powerline; Veloce; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Altro
fi: Ethernet-lähiverkkoliitäntätyyppi: 10 gigabittiä; Ethernet; Ethernet HDMI:n kautta; Ethernet USB:n kautta; Ethernet Wi-Fi:n kautta; Ethernet matkapuhelinverkon kautta; Ethernet koaksiaalin kautta; Ethernet kuidun kautta; Ethernet sähkölinjan kautta; Nopea; Gigabitti; Monigigabittinen; Muu
da: Ethernetgrænsefladetype: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet over HDMI; Ethernet over USB; Ethernet over Wi-Fi; Ethernet over mobilnetværk; Ethernet over coax; Ethernet over fiber; Ethernet over strømledning; Hurtig; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Andet
sk-SK: Typ rozhrania LAN ethernetového pripojenia: 10 gigabitov; Ethernet; Ethernet cez HDMI; Ethernet cez USB; Ethernet cez Wi-Fi; Ethernet cez mobilnú sieť; Ethernet cez koaxiálny kábel; Ethernet cez vlákno; Ethernet cez elektrické vedenie; Rýchlo; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta Ethernet LAN sučelja: 10 gigabita; Ethernet; Ethernet putem HDMI priključka; Ethernet putem USB priključka; Ethernet putem Wi-Fi mreže; Ethernet putem mobilne mreže; Ethernet putem koaksijalnog kabela; Ethernet putem vlakana; Ethernet putem energetskog voda; Brzo; Gigabit; Multigigabit; Ostalo
nl: Ethernet-Lan-interfacetype: 10 gigabit; Ethernet; Ethernet via HDMI; Ethernet via USB; Ethernet via wifi; Ethernet via mobiel; Ethernet via coax; Ethernet via glasvezel; Ethernet via voedingskabel; Snel; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de interface LAN Ethernet: 10 Gigabits; Ethernet; Ethernet para HDMI; Ethernet para USB; Ethernet para Wi-Fi; Ethernet para celular; Ethernet para coax; Ethernet para fibra; Ethernet para powerline; Rápido; Gigabit; Multigigabit; Outro
ja: イーサネットLANインターフェイの種類: 10ギガビット; イーサネット; HDMI経由のイーサネット; USB経由のイーサネット; Wi-Fi経由のイーサネット; イーサネットオーバーセルラー; 同軸経由のイーサネット; ファイバー経由のイーサネット; 送電線経由のイーサネット; 高速; ギガビット; マルチギガビット; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de interface de LAN Ethernet: 10 gigabits; Ethernet; Ethernet sobre HDMI; Ethernet sobre USB; Ethernet sobre Wi-Fi; Ethernet sobre celular; Ethernet sobre coaxial; Ethernet sobre fibra; Ethernet sobre rede elétrica; Rápido; Gigabit; Multi-gigabit; Outro
bg-BG: Тип интерфейс на LAN за Ethernet: 10 гигабита; Ethernet; Ethernet през HDMI; Ethernet през USB; Ethernet през Wi-Fi; Ethernet през мобилна мрежа; Ethernet по коаксиален кабел; Ethernet през оптични влакна; Ethernet през захранваща линия; Бърз; Гигабитов; Мултигигабитов; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta vmesnika ethernet LAN: 10 gigabitov; Ethernet; Ethernet preko HDMI; Ethernet preko USB; Ethernet preko Wi-Fi; Ethernet prek mobilnega omrežja; Ethernet preko koaksialnega kabla; Ethernet preko optičnega omrežja; Ethernet preko električnega voda; Hitra; Gigabit; Več gigabitov; Drugo